North Dakota, session 69, HB1034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 27 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. "Child" means an individual under the age of eighteen.
2. "Custodian" means a person, other than a genetic parent or legal guardian, which stands in
loco parentis to the child and to which legal custody of the child has been given by the court.
3. "Department" means the department of health and human services.
4. "Division of juvenile services" means the division within the department of corrections and
rehabilitation established in chapter 27 - 21 .
5. "Genetic parent" means the biological mother or adjudicated mother of the child, or the
presumed father or adjudicated father of the child under chapter 14 - 20 .
6. "Human service zone" means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human
services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the
department.
7. "Parental rights and responsibilities" means all rights and responsibilities a genetic parent has
concerning the parent's child.
8. "Re - establishment of the legal parent and child relationship" means the physical reunification
of a child under the custody of the human service zone or division of juvenile services, and a
previously terminated genetic parent, and restoration of all rights, powers, privileges,
immunities, duties, and obligations that were severed and terminated by the court under
section 27 - 20.3 - 20 .
Jurisdiction.
The juvenile court has exclusive original jurisdiction over all proceedings for re - establishment of the
legal parent and child relationship which are governed by this chapter.
Venue - Inconvenient forum .
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a proceeding under this chapter must be
commenced in the county in which the child resides.
2. A proceeding for re - establishment of parental rights and responsibilities must be brought in the
court in the county in which the child subject of the petition resides or in which the agency

H. B. NO. 1034 - PAGE 2
having the care, custody, or control of the child is located, at the time of filing or granting the
petition.
3. If the court finds in the interest of substantial justice the matter should be heard in another
forum, the court may transfer, stay, or dismiss the proceeding in whole or in part on any
condition that is just.
Petition - Who may prepare and file .
A petition for re - establishment of the legal parent and child relationship may be filed by any
interested party from the original termination of parental rights proceeding if:
1. The state's attorney receives a copy of the petition and the responsible custodian and the
state's attorney agree re - establishment of the legal parent and child relationship is in the
child's best interests;
2. The genetic parent is willing and has the capability to provide day - to - day care and maintain
the health, safety, and welfare of the child;
3. At least twelve months have elapsed following a final order terminating parental rights and the
child remains in foster care;
4. There is no pending litigation or appeal pertaining to the original termination of parental rights
proceeding;
5. The child has not been adopted; and
6. The child is not the subject of a written adoption placement agreement between the
responsible custodian and the prospective adoptive parent.
Contents of petition.
A petitioner for re - establishment of the legal parent and child relationship shall sign the petition
under oath and the petition must include:
1. The full name, date of birth, address, and all other legal names and aliases by which the
genetic parents have been known at any time;
2. The full name and date of birth of each child for whom reunification is sought;
3. The petitioner's relationship to each child for whom reunification is sought;
4. To which genetic parent or parents the rights are sought to be re - established ;
5. The reasons for seeking reunification and why reunification is in the child's best interest;
6. The details of the termination of parental rights for which reunification is sought, including the
date and jurisdiction of the order, and the court file number and date of any previous order
terminating parental rights;
7. The details of any other active juvenile court case in which the genetic parent is a named
party, including the case's court file number;
8. The steps the genetic parent has taken toward personal rehabilitation since the order
terminating parental rights, including treatment, work, or other personal history demonstrating
rehabilitation;
9. How the genetic parent whose rights are sought to be re - established has corrected the
condition leading to the order terminating parental rights for which reunification is sought;

H. B. NO. 1034 - PAGE 3
10. The reason the genetic parent is willing and capable to provide day - to - day care and maintain
the health, safety, and welfare of the child; and
11. Any previous request by any party, whether for the present order terminating parental rights or
for any other order terminating parental rights, whether granted or not.
Petition may not be brought in certain circumstances.
A petition for the re - establishment of the legal parent and child relationship may not be brought i f
the genetic parent whose rights are the subject of the petition for re - establishment previously has had
parental rights terminated based on a:
1. Finding of sexual abuse; or
2. Conviction for intentional conduct that resulted in the substantial bodily injury or death of a
minor.
Right to appointed counsel.
1. A child within the jurisdiction of the court in an action arising under this chapter has the right to
be represented by counsel in all proceedings in which a petition has been filed. The court shall
appoint counsel to represent the child, regardless of income, unless counsel is retained for the
child, in any proceeding in which the child is of sufficient age and competency to assist
counsel.
2. A child who is fourteen years of age or older may waive the right to counsel. The waiver must
be made on the record and the court shall determine if the waiver is knowing, voluntary, and
intelligent. If a child waives counsel for a hearing, the court shall inform the child of the right to
revoke the waiver and request counsel at all subsequent hearings.
3. A genetic parent is entitled to counsel upon the filing of an application for counsel and a
determination of indigency. If a party appears without counsel, the court shall determine
whether the party knows the party may be represented by counsel and the party is entitled to
counsel at public expense if indigent. The court may continue the proceeding to enable a party
to obtain counsel.
Appointment of guardian ad litem for child - Immunity .
In a proceeding under this chapter, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is a
party to the proceeding upon motion of the court or by motion or agreement of the parties. The guardian
ad litem shall serve as an advocate of the child's best interests. A guardian ad litem appointed under
this section is immune from civil liability for damages for any act or omission arising out of the guardian
ad litem's duties and responsibilities, unless the act or omission constitutes gross or willful negligence
or gross or willful misconduct.
Prima facie review of petition.
1. Upon filing of a petition for the re - establishment of the legal parent and child relationship, the
court shall consider the petition without oral argument or evidentiary hearing and shall deny
the petition unless the court finds the petitioner has established a prima facie case justifying
that re - establishment of parental rights is in the child's best interest. If a prima facie case is no t
established, the court shall dismiss the petition.
2. If a prima facie case is established, the court shall set a date for an evidentiary hearing. The
clerk of district court or juvenile court shall provide a copy of the petition and summons to any
interested party.

H. B. NO. 1034 - PAGE 4
Trial home placement.
1. After the petition is filed, the court may order the necessary parties to create a transition plan.
The plan must provide for the health and safety of the child and outline the transition services
to the genetic parent, as well as the conditions and supervisions required by the human
service zone for transitioning the child into the home on a trial basis, with the ultimate goal
being full reunification before the hearing on the petition.
2. The human service zone shall monitor the genetic parent during the implementation of the
plan and shall identify and assist the genetic parent in using appropriate family preservation
strategies and accessing community resources to provide for the health and safety of the
child.
3. During the time of transition, the human service zone shall remove the child from the genetic
parent's home upon any abuse or neglect allegation. If the child is removed, the human
service zone shall notify the court of the removal and the court shall deny the petition as
provided for in this chapter.
Hearing.
1. The petitioner has the burden of proof at the hearing.
2. At the hearing, the court may grant the petition ordering the re - establishment of the lega l
parent and child relationship only if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:
a. Re - establishment of the legal parent and child relationship is in the child's best interests ;
b. There is no pending litigation or appeal pertaining to the original termination of parental
rights proceeding;
c. The genetic parent whose rights are sought to be re - established is not named in any
other active juvenile court case;
d. The child has not been adopted;
e. The child is not the subject of a written adoption placement agreement between the
responsible social services agency and the prospective adoptive parent;
f. At least twelve months have elapsed following a final order terminating parental rights
and the child remains in foster care;
g. The genetic parent has corrected the condition that led to the order terminating parental
rights; and
h. The genetic parent is willing and has the capability to provide day - to - day care and
maintain the health, safety, and welfare of the child.
3. In determining whether to grant a petition under this chapter, the court shall consider the
child's age, maturity, and ability to express a preference and may consider the child's
preference regarding the re - establishment as one factor, along with any other relevant factor .
Order re - establishing parental rights - Effect .
1. In granting a petition for re - establishment of the legal parent and child relationship, the cour t
shall enter its finding in a written order providing that from the date of the order of
re - establishment of parental rights, the child is the child of the genetic parent whose rights
were terminated and must be accorded all the same rights as existed before the order
terminating parental rights, including inheritance rights. The order must include that all legal

H. B. NO. 1034 - PAGE 5
rights, powers, privileges, immunities, duties, and obligations to each other as genetic parent
and child are re - established .
2. As of the effective date of a court order providing for the re - establishment of the legal paren t
and child relationship:
a. The child is the legal child of the genetic parent;
b. The genetic parent whose rights were terminated under a previous order of the court is
restored to the status of legal parent of the child and all rights, powers, privileges,
immunities, duties, and obligations that were severed and terminated by the court under
section 27 - 20.3 - 20 are restored ;
c. The order placing the child under the care, custody, and control of the human service
zone or division of juvenile services is terminated; and
d. Permanent legal and physical custody of the child is awarded to the genetic parent.
3. An order re - establishing the legal parent and child relationship as to one genetic parent of the
child has no effect on:
a. The legal rights of any other genetic parent whose rights to the child have been
terminated by the court; or
b. The legal sibling relationship between the child and any other children of the genetic
parent.
Denial - Subsequent petitions .
If the court denies a petition under this chapter after a hearing, the court may issue a written order
barring the filing of a subsequent petition by the genetic parent. The court shall provide the length of
time the genetic parent is barred from filing a subsequent petition, make written findings in support of
the order, and evaluate the best interests of the child.

H. B. NO. 1034 - PAGE 6
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1034.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State